Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7a. new text end new text begin Licensing moratorium exception; former customized living settings. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding subdivision 7 and section 256B.493, if the commissioner determines that the setting complies with all applicable rules and laws, the commissioner shall issue an initial license for a community residential setting that was a customized living service setting serving people under the brain injury or community access for disability inclusion waiver plans under section 256B.49 in a single-family home and was operational on June 30, 2025. "Operational" has the meaning given in section 256B.49, subdivision 28, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall issue licenses under this subdivision for a licensed capacity equal to the capacity of the customized living setting on June 30, 2025, not to exceed five. new text end new text begin (c) Eligible applicants must apply for a community residential setting under this subdivision by June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner's authority under subdivision 7 and section 256B.493 to manage statewide licensed community residential settings capacity, including the reduction and realignment of licensed capacity of a community residential setting, does not apply to settings licensed under this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end